fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Esitystarvikkeet > Esitystaulut > Ilmoitustaulujen lisätarvikkeet: Ilmoitustaulujen koristeet; Ilmoitustaulujen koristesetit
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Консумативи за презентации > Табла > Аксесоари за табла за обяви: Рамки за табла за обяви; Комплекти рамки за табла за обяви
ko: 사무용품 > 프레젠테이션 용품 > 디스플레이 보드 > 게시판 부대용품: 게시판 장식; 게시판 장식 세트
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Prezentační materiály > Výstavní plochy > Příslušenství k nástěnkám: Bordury na nástěnky; Sady dekoračních okrajů pro nástěnku
nb: Kontormateriell > Presentasjonsutstyr > Presentasjonstavler > Tilbehør til oppslagstavler: Dekor til oppslagstavler; Dekorsett til oppslagstavler
en: Office Supplies > Presentation Supplies > Display Boards > Bulletin Board Accessories: Bulletin Board Trim; Bulletin Board Trim Sets
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Thiết bị thuyết trình > Bảng hiển thị > Phụ kiện bảng tin: Đồ dán trang trí bảng tin; Bộ đường viền trang trí bảng tin
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sprzęt do prezentacji > Tablice do prezentacji > Akcesoria do tablic biurowych: Obramowania do tablic biurowych; Zestawy dekoracyjne do tablic ogłoszeniowych
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 簡報用品 > 展示板 > 佈告欄配件: 佈告欄邊框裝飾; 公告欄裝飾組
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Presentationsmaterial > Presentationstavlor > Tillbehör för anslagstavlor: Rampanel för anslagstavla; Dekorationsset för anslagstavla
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αναλώσιμα παρουσίασης > Πίνακες προβολής > Αξεσουάρ πινακίδων ανακοινώσεων: Διακοσμητικές κορνίζες για πινακίδες; Σετ διακοσμητικών κορνιζών για πινακίδες
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 演示用品 > 展示板 > 公告板配件: 公告板边框装饰品; 布告栏装饰套装
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Prezentacijski pribor > Ploče za prezentaciju > Pribor za oglasne ploče: Obloga za oglasne ploče; Set obloga za oglasne ploče
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Товары для проведения презентаций > Презентационные и выставочные доски > Аксессуары для пробковых досок: Декоративные ленты для пробковых досок; Наборы декоративных лент для пробковых досок
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Materiais de apresentação > Quadros de apresentação > Acessórios para quadros informativos: Guarnição para quadros informativos; Conjuntos de guarnição para quadros informativos
it: Forniture per ufficio > Forniture per presentazioni > Pannelli di visualizzazione > Accessori per bacheche informative: Decorazioni per bacheche informative; Set per lavagna per spilli
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Matériel de présentation et d'affichage > Affichages > Accessoires pour panneaux d'affichage: Bordures pour panneaux d'affichage; Ensembles de bordures pour panneaux d'affichage
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์นำเสนองาน > ป้ายนิเทศ > อุปกรณ์กระดานข่าว: ที่ตกแต่งขอบกระดานข่าว; ชุดอุปกรณ์สำหรับตกแต่งบอร์ด
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Potreby na prezentáciu > Prezentačné tabule > Príslušenstvo k nástenkám: Ozdobné lišty nástenky; Súpravy ozdobných líšt pre nástenky
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Presentatiebenodigdheden > Presentatieborden > Accessoires voor prikborden: Sierlijsten voor prikborden; Accessoires voor prikbord
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Sunum Malzemeleri > Sergi Panoları > İlan Panosu Aksesuarları: İlan Panosu Çerçevesi; İlan Panosu Kırpma Setleri
hu: Irodai kellékek > Prezentációs kellékek > Kijelzőtáblák > Faliújság-kiegészítők: Faliújság-szegélyező; Faliújságszegélyező készletek
ja: オフィス用品 > プレゼン用品 > 展示用ボード・パネル > 掲示板関連用品: 掲示板用飾り; 掲示板用トリムセット
es: Material de oficina > Accesorios para presentaciones > Paneles de exposición > Accesorios para tablones de anuncios: Ribetes para tablones de anuncios; Juegos de bordes de carteleras de anuncios
de: Bürobedarf > Präsentationsbedarf > Ausstellungstafeln > Zubehör für Anschlagbretter: Dekorative Elemente für Anschlagbretter; Pinnwand-Dekosets
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Suprimentos para apresentações > Quadros de exibição > Acessórios para quadro de avisos: Moldura para quadro de avisos; Conjuntos de acabamento de quadro de avisos
da: Kontorforsyning > Præsentationsmaterialer > Præsentationstavler > Tilbehør til opslagstavler: Pynt til opslagstavle; Dekorationssæt til opslagstavler
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Consumabile de prezentare > Aviziere > Accesorii pentru panouri cu informații: Benzi decorative pentru panouri cu informații; Seturi de benzi decorative pentru panouri cu informații
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pripomočki za predstavitve > Table za predstavitve > Dodatki za oglasne deske: Obrobe za oglasne deske; Kompleti obrob za oglasne deske
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Pristatymų reikmenys > Ekranai > Skelbimų lentų priedai: Skelbimų lentų apdaila; Skelbimų lentų apdailos rinkiniai